Maryland, session 2025, HB1013.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
15–102.3.
(M) BEGINNING JULY 1, 2026, THE PROVISIONS OF §§ 15–142(E)(2) AND
15–861 OF THE INSURANCE ARTICLE APPLY TO MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATIONS IN
THE SAME MANNER THEY APPLY TO CARRIERS.
15–103.
(a) (1) The Secretary shall administer the Maryland Medical Assistance
Program.
(2) The Program:
(xxiii) Beginning on July 1, 2025, shall provide, subject to the
limitations of the State budget, and as permitted by federal law, coverage for biomarker
testing in accordance with § 15–859 of the Insurance Article; [and]
(xxiv) Beginning on January 1, 2025, shall provide coverage for
prostheses in accordance with § 15–844 of the Insurance Article; AND

HOUSE BILL 1013 3
(XXV) BEGINNING ON JULY 1, 2026, SHALL PROVIDE COVERAGE
FOR ANY NONOPIOID DRUG APPROVED BY THE U.S. FOOD AND DRUG
ADMINISTRATION FOR THE TREATMENT OF PAIN TO THE SAME EXTENT AS A
COVERED OPIOID OR NARCOTIC DRUG USED FOR THE TREATMENT OF PAIN.
15–157.
BEGINNING ON JULY 1, 2026, THE PROGRAM MAY NOT APPLY A PRIOR
AUTHORIZATION REQUIREMENT, FAIL–FIRST PROTOCOL, OR STEP THERAPY
PROTOCOL FOR A NONOPIOID DRUG APPROVED BY THE U.S. FOOD AND DRUG
ADMINISTRATION FOR THE TREATMENT OF PAIN THAT IS MORE RESTRICTIVE THAN
A PRIOR AUTHORIZATION REQUIREMENT, FAIL–FIRST PROTOCOL, OR STEP
THERAPY PROTOCOL APPLIED TO AN OPIOID OR NARCOTIC DRUG USED FOR THE
TREATMENT OF PAIN.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Insurance
15–142.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(4) (i) “Step therapy or fail–first protocol” means a protocol established
by an insurer, a nonprofit health service plan, or a health maintenance organization that
requires a prescription drug or sequence of prescription drugs to be used by an insured or
an enrollee before a prescription drug ordered by a prescriber for the insured or the enrollee
is covered.
(ii) “Step therapy or fail–first protocol” includes a protocol that
meets the definition under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph regardless of the name, label,
or terminology used by the insurer, nonprofit health service plan, or health maintenance
organization to identify the protocol.
(b) (1) This section applies to:
(i) insurers and nonprofit health service plans that provide hospital,
medical, or surgical benefits to individuals or groups on an expense–incurred basis under
health insurance policies or contracts that are issued or delivered in the State; and
(ii) health maintenance organizations that provide hospital,
medical, or surgical benefits to individuals or groups under contracts that are issued or
delivered in the State.

HOUSE BILL 1013
(2) An insurer, a nonprofit health service plan, or a health maintenance
organization that provides coverage for prescription drugs through a pharmacy benefits
manager is subject to the requirements of this section.
(e) An entity subject to this section may not impose a step therapy or fail–first
protocol on an insured or an enrollee for a prescription drug approved by the U.S. Food and
Drug Administration if:
(1) (I) the prescription drug is used to treat the insured’s or enrollee’s
stage four advanced metastatic cancer; and
[(2)] (II) use of the prescription drug is:
[(i)] 1. consistent with the U.S. Food and Drug
Administration–approved indication or the National Comprehensive Cancer Network
Drugs & Biologics Compendium indication for the treatment of stage four advanced
metastatic cancer; and
[(ii)] 2. supported by peer–reviewed medical literature; OR
(2) THE PRESCRIPTION DRUG IS A NONOPIOID DRUG APPROVED BY
THE U.S. FOOD AND DRUG ADMINISTRATION FOR THE TREATMENT OF PAIN AND
THE ENTITY DOES NOT IMPOSE A STEP THERAPY OR FAIL–FIRST PROTOCOL FOR AN
OPIOID OR NARCOTIC DRUG USED FOR THE TREATMENT OF PAIN.
15–861.
(A) (1) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO:
(I) INSURERS AND NONPROFIT HEALTH SERVICE PLANS THAT
PROVIDE COVERAGE FOR PRESCRIPTION DRUGS UNDER INDIVIDUAL, GROUP, OR
BLANKET HEALTH INSURANCE POLICIES OR CONTRACTS THAT ARE ISSUED OR
DELIVERED IN THE STATE; AND
(II) HEALTH MAINTENANCE ORGANIZATIONS THAT PROVIDE
COVERAGE FOR PRESCRIPTION DRUGS UNDER INDIVIDUAL OR GROUP CONTRACTS
THAT ARE ISSUED OR DELIVERED IN THE STATE.
(2) AN INSURER, A NONPROFIT HEALTH SERVICE PLAN, OR A HEALTH
MAINTENANCE ORGANIZATION THAT PROVIDES COVERAGE FOR PRESCRIPTION
DRUGS THROUGH A PHARMACY BENEFITS MANAGER IS SUBJECT TO THE
REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION.
(B) AN ENTITY SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION SHALL PROVIDE COVERAGE FOR
ANY NONOPIOID DRUG APPROVED BY THE U.S. FOOD AND DRUG ADMINISTRATION

HOUSE BILL 1013 5
FOR THE TREATMENT OF PAIN TO THE SAME EXTENT AS A COVERED OPIOID OR
NARCOTIC DRUG USED FOR THE TREATMENT OF PAIN.
(C) AN ENTITY SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION MAY NOT APPLY A PRIOR
AUTHORIZATION REQUIREMENT FOR A NONOPIOID PRESCRIPTION DRUG APPROVED
BY THE U.S. FOOD AND DRUG ADMINISTRATION FOR THE TREATMENT OF PAIN
THAT IS MORE RESTRICTIVE THAN A PRIOR AUTHORIZATION REQUIREMENT
APPLIED TO AN OPIOID OR NARCOTIC DRUG USED FOR THE TREATMENT OF PAIN.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) On or before December 1, 2026, each insurer and nonprofit health service plan
that provides coverage for prescription drugs under individual, group, or blanket health
insurance policies or contracts that are issued or delivered in the State and each health
maintenance organization that provides coverage for prescription drugs under individual
or group contracts that are issued or delivered in the State shall submit to the Maryland
Insurance Administration a plan to provide adequate coverage and access to a broad
spectrum of pain management services, including nonopioid drugs for the treatment and
management of pain and nonpharmologic, nonoperative pain management modalities that
serve as an alternative to the prescribing of opioid drugs.
(b) The Maryland Insurance Administration shall review each plan submitted
under subsection (a) of this section to determine whether the entity submitting the plan is
in compliance with this Act and whether any policies adopted by the entity may create
unduly preferential coverage of and access to opioid drugs.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 2 of this Act shall
apply to all policies, contracts, and health benefit plans issued, delivered, or renewed in the
State on or after January 1, 2026.
SECTION 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 2 of this Act shall take
effect January 1, 2026.
SECTION 6. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, except as provided in Section
5 of this Act, this Act shall take effect July 1, 2025.